Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1478XC (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 257.3, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 d. For purposes of this section , a reorganized school 3 district is one which absorbs at least thirty percent of the 4 enrollment of the school district affected by a reorganization 5 or dissolved during a dissolution and in which action to bring 6 about a reorganization or dissolution is initiated by a vote 7 of the board of directors or jointly by the affected boards of 8 directors to take effect on or after July 1, 2007, and on or 9 before July 1, 2024 2030 . Each district which initiated, by 10 a vote of the board of directors or jointly by the affected 11 boards, action to bring about a reorganization or dissolution 12 to take effect on or after July 1, 2007, and on or before July 13 1, 2024 2030 , shall certify the date and the nature of the 14 action taken to the department of education by January 1 of the 15 year in which the reorganization or dissolution takes effect. 16 Sec. 2. Section 257.11, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 c. Pupils attending class for all or a substantial portion 19 of a school day pursuant to a whole grade sharing agreement 20 executed under sections 282.10 through 282.12 shall be eligible 21 for supplementary weighting pursuant to this subsection . A 22 school district which executes a whole grade sharing agreement 23 and which adopts a resolution jointly with other affected 24 boards to study the question of undergoing a reorganization 25 or dissolution to take effect on or before July 1, 2024 2030 , 26 shall receive a weighting of one-tenth of the percentage of 27 the pupilâs school day during which the pupil attends classes 28 in another district, attends classes taught by a teacher who 29 is jointly employed under section 280.15 , or attends classes 30 taught by a teacher who is employed by another school district. 31 A district shall be eligible for supplementary weighting 32 pursuant to this paragraph for a maximum of three years. 33 Receipt of supplementary weighting for a second and third year 34 shall be conditioned upon submission of information resulting 35 -1- LSB 1478XC (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. _____ from the study to the school budget review committee indicating 1 progress toward the objective of reorganization on or before 2 July 1, 2024 2030 . 3 Sec. 3. Section 257.11A, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, are 4 amended to read as follows: 5 1. In determining weighted enrollment under section 257.6 , 6 if the board of directors of a school district has approved a 7 contract for sharing pursuant to section 257.11 and the school 8 district has approved an action to bring about a reorganization 9 to take effect on and after July 1, 2007, and on or before July 10 1, 2024 2030 , the reorganized school district shall include, 11 for a period of three years following the effective date of 12 the reorganization, additional pupils added by the application 13 of the supplementary weighting plan, equal to the pupils added 14 by the application of the supplementary weighting plan in the 15 year preceding the reorganization. For the purposes of this 16 subsection , the weighted enrollment for the period of three 17 years following the effective date of reorganization shall 18 include the supplementary weighting in the base year used for 19 determining the combined district cost for the first year of 20 the reorganization. However, the weighting shall be reduced by 21 the supplementary weighting added for a pupil whose residency 22 is not within the reorganized district. 23 2. For purposes of this section , a reorganized district is 24 one in which the reorganization was approved in an election 25 pursuant to sections 275.18 and 275.20 and takes effect on or 26 after July 1, 2007, and on or before July 1, 2024 2030 . Each 27 district which initiates, by a vote of the board of directors 28 or jointly by the affected boards, action to bring about a 29 reorganization or dissolution to take effect on or after July 30 1, 2007, and on or before July 1, 2024 2030 , shall certify the 31 date and the nature of the action taken to the department of 32 education by January 1 of the year in which the reorganization 33 or dissolution takes effect. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -2- LSB 1478XC (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 3 S.F. _____ The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill extends certain incentives for whole grade sharing 3 by school districts and for school district reorganization or 4 dissolution from July 1, 2024, to July 1, 2030. 5 The bill provides for a reduced uniform levy as an incentive 6 for school districts that reorganize on or before July 1, 2030. 7 School districts that execute a whole grade sharing 8 agreement and adopt a resolution to study the effect of 9 undergoing a reorganization or dissolution to take effect on 10 or before July 1, 2030, are allowed to receive a weighting of 11 one-tenth of the percentage of a studentâs school day during 12 which the student attends classes in another district, is 13 taught by a teacher jointly employed, or attends classes taught 14 by a teacher employed by another district. This supplementary 15 weighting is available for not more than three years. However, 16 a school district that reorganizes before July 1, 2030, is 17 eligible, for up to three years following reorganization, to 18 continue to receive supplementary weighting in an amount that 19 is equal to the funding that the district received in the year 20 preceding the effective date of its reorganization. 21 The bill does not affect the combined maximum total six-year 22 limitation on a school districtâs eligibility for supplementary 23 weighting. 24 -3- LSB 1478XC (1) 91 jda/jh 3/ 3